South Dakota, session 2026, SB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-4-19.1 be AMENDED:
12-4-19.1. If the acknowledgement notice sent pursuant to § 12-4-5.3 is returned
to the county auditor as undeliverable, the auditor must send a confirmation mailing letter
or postcard that:
(1) States the voter's registration may be canceled if the letter or postcard is not
returned;
(2) Lists the voter's information, as it appears in the master registration file; and
(3) Provides the following instructions:
(a) If the information on the letter or card is correct, the voter must sign and
return the letter or card within thirty days of the date of the postmark on
the letter or card, or the voter's registration will become inactive;
(b) If the information on the letter or card is not correct, the voter must send
the correct information to update the voter's registration, within thirty days
of the date of the postmark on the letter or card, or the voter's registration
will become inactive; and
(c) If the letter or card is returned indicating a new address in another county
in South Dakota or another state, the card serves as a cancellation
authorization.
Section 2. That § 12-4-19.2 be AMENDED:
12-4-19.2. The county auditor must move the voter to an inactive registration file
if:

26.309.29 2 31
(1) The voter does not return the confirmation mailing by the deadline stated on the
mailing; or
(2) The confirmation mailing is returned to the auditor as undeliverable.
Section 3. That § 12-4-19.7 be AMENDED:
12-4-19.7. If the address verification request sent pursuant to § 12-4-19 is
returned to the county auditor as undeliverable, the auditor must send a voter registration
list maintenance confirmation mailing letter or postcard that:
(1) States the voter's registration may be canceled if the letter or postcard is not
returned;
(2) Lists the voter's information, as it appears in the master registration file; and
(3) Provides the following instructions:
(a) If the information on the letter or card is correct, the voter must sign and
return the letter or card by the voter registration deadline of the primary
election or the voter's registration will become inactive;
(b) If the information on the letter or card is not correct, the voter must send
the correct information to update the voter's registration by the voter
registration deadline of the primary election or the voter's registration will
become inactive; and
(c) If the card is returned indicating a new address in another county in South
Dakota or another state, the card serves as a cancellation authorization.
Section 4. This Act is effective beginning December 1, 2026.
SB31 ENROLLED

26.309.29 3 31
An Act to permit the use of a confirmation letter to verify a voter's registration.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 31
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 31 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB31 ENROLLED